Mississippi, session 2026, HB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Sections 1 through 4 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "Voluntary Portable Benefit Plan Act." SECTION 2.  As used in Sections 1 through 4 of this act, the following words and phrases have the meanings provided in this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Bank" means a state bank, national bank, out-of-state state-chartered bank or a foreign bank organized under the laws of a territory of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, or the United States Virgin Islands, with deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. (b)  "Hiring party" means a person or entity who hires or enters into a contract with an independent contractor. (c)  "Portable benefit account" means an account owned by an independent contractor to fund the purchase of one or more benefit plans. (d)  "Portable benefit account provider" means the administrator of a portable benefit account, including: (i)  A bank; (ii)  An investment management firm; (iii)  A technology provider or program manager that offers services through a bank or investment management firm; or (iv)  A person who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance that the manner in which the person will administer the portable benefit account will be consistent with the portable benefit account requirements under Sections 1 through 4 of this act. (e)  "Portable benefit plan" means a benefit plan administered by a third-party benefit plan provider chosen by the independent contractor and assigned to a beneficiary rather than to a hiring party and includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Health insurance; (ii)  Unemployment insurance; (iii)  Income replacement insurance; (iv)  Disability insurance; (v)  Life insurance; and (vi)  Retirement benefits. SECTION 3. (1)  A person or entity, whether public or private, including an Internet or application based company, may contribute funds voluntarily to a portable benefit account for an independent contractor. (2)  Contributions by a hiring party to a portable benefit account may not be treated as evidence that a worker is an employee of the hiring party under state or federal laws and regulations governing unemployment insurance, worker's compensation, taxation and labor. (3)  Contributions to a portable benefit account may be made using: (a)  The funds of a hiring party; or (b)  A percentage of funds withheld from the compensation owed to an independent contractor if all of the following conditions are met: (i)  The withholding of compensation is expressly agreed to in writing; (ii)  The written agreement is clear, unambiguous and prominently displayed either in a work contract or separate invoice; (iii)  The withholdings are voluntary and require the independent contractor to opt-in; and (iv)  The independent contractor may choose to opt-out of the withholdings at any time. SECTION 4. (1)  A hiring party that contributes funds to a portable benefit account pursuant to Section 3 of this act may deduct as a business expense an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount contributed during the applicable tax year. (2)  An independent contractor may exclude from taxable income an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount contributed by a hiring party to the independent contractor's portable benefit account pursuant to Section 3 of this act during the applicable tax year. SECTION 5.  Section 27-7-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-7-17.  In computing taxable income, there shall be allowed as deductions: (1)  Business deductions. (a)  Business expenses.  All the ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred during the taxable year in carrying on any trade or business, including a reasonable allowance for salaries or other compensation for personal services actually rendered; contributions to a portable benefit account owned by an independent contractor that performed work for the business, as authorized under Sections 1 through 4 of this act; nonreimbursable traveling expenses incident to current employment, including a reasonable amount expended for meals and lodging while away from home in the pursuit of a trade or business; and rentals or other payments required to be made as a condition of the continued use or possession, for purposes of the trade or business of property to which the taxpayer has not taken or is not taking title or in which he had no equity. Expense incurred in connection with earning and distributing nontaxable income is not an allowable deduction.  Limitations on entertainment expenses shall conform to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.  There shall also be allowed a deduction for expenses as provided in Section 41-137-51. (b)  Interest. All interest paid or accrued during the taxable year on business indebtedness, except interest upon the indebtedness for the purchase of tax-free bonds, or any stocks, the dividends from which are nontaxable under the provisions of this article; provided, however, in the case of securities dealers, interest payments or accruals on loans, the proceeds of which are used to purchase tax-exempt securities, shall be deductible if income from otherwise tax-free securities is reported as income.  Investment interest expense shall be limited to investment income.  Interest expense incurred for the purchase of treasury stock, to pay dividends, or incurred as a result of an undercapitalized affiliated corporation may not be deducted unless an ordinary and necessary business purpose can be established to the satisfaction of the commissioner.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the phrase "interest upon the indebtedness for the purchase of tax-free bonds" applies only to the indebtedness incurred for the purpose of directly purchasing tax-free bonds and does not apply to any other indebtedness incurred in the regular course of the taxpayer's business. Any corporation, association, organization or other entity taxable under Section 27-7-23(c) shall allocate interest expense as provided in Section 27-7-23(c)(3)(I). (c)  Taxes. Taxes paid or accrued within the taxable year, except state and federal income taxes, excise taxes based on or measured by net income, estate and inheritance taxes, gift taxes, cigar and cigarette taxes, gasoline taxes, and sales and use taxes unless incurred as an item of expense in a trade or business or in the production of taxable income.  In the case of an individual, taxes permitted as an itemized deduction under the provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section are to be claimed thereunder. (d)  Business losses. (i)  Losses sustained during the taxable year not compensated for by insurance or otherwise, if incurred in trade or business, or nonbusiness transactions entered into for profit. (ii)  Limitations on losses from passive activities and rental real estate shall conform to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. (e)  Bad debts. Losses from debts ascertained to be worthless and charged off during the taxable year, if sustained in the conduct of the regular trade or business of the taxpayer; provided, that such losses shall be allowed only when the taxpayer has reported as income, on the accrual basis, the amount of such debt or account. (f)  Depreciation. (i)  A reasonable allowance for exhaustion, wear and tear of property used in the trade or business, or rental property, and depreciation upon buildings based upon their reasonable value as of March 16, 1912, if acquired prior thereto, and upon cost if acquired subsequent to that date.  In the case of new or used aircraft, equipment, engines, or other parts and tools used for aviation, allowance for bonus depreciation conforms with the federal bonus depreciation rates and reasonable allowance for depreciation under this section is no less than one hundred percent (100%). (ii)  1.  For the purposes of computing income tax for tax years beginning after December 31, 2022, a taxpayer may treat specified research or experimental expenditures that are paid or incurred by the taxpayer during the tax year in connection with the taxpayer's trade or business as expenses that are not chargeable to the capital account.  Such expenditures so treated shall be allowed as an immediate deduction.  Such expenditures shall remain allowable as a full and immediate expense deduction in the year in which the expenses are incurred notwithstanding any changes to the federal Internal Revenue Code related to the depreciation of such specified research or experimental expenditures.  A taxpayer may alternatively treat the depreciation of such specified research or experimental expenditures in accordance with the schedule provided in 26 USCS Section 174.  A taxpayer may make an election whether to take a full and immediate deduction for such expenditures and/or to depreciate the expenditures in accordance with 26 USCS Section 174.  Such an election may be made for any tax year if made not later than the time prescribed by law for filing the return for such tax year, including extensions thereof.  The method so elected by the taxpayer is irrevocable unless the commissioner specifically allows a change in the method. 2.  For the purpose of computing income tax for tax years beginning after December 31, 2022, expenditures for business assets that are qualified property or qualified improvement property shall be eligible for one hundred percent (100%) bonus depreciation and may be deducted as an expense incurred by the taxpayer during the tax year during which the property is placed in service, notwithstanding any changes to federal law related to cost recovery beginning on January 1, 2023, or on any other date.  A taxpayer may alternatively treat the depreciation of such business assets in accordance with the schedule provided in 26 USCS Section 168.  A taxpayer may make an election whether to take a bonus depreciation deduction for such expenditures and/or to depreciate the expenditures in accordance with 26 USCS Section 168.  Such an election may be made for any tax year if made not later than the time prescribed by law for filing the return for such tax year, including extensions thereof.  The method so elected by the taxpayer is irrevocable unless the commissioner specifically allows a change in the method. 3.  In any taxable year in which any 26 USCS Section 179 property is placed in service, a taxpayer may elect to treat the cost of such property as an expense which is not chargeable to a capital account, and any cost so treated shall be allowed as a deduction for that year.  Mississippi's treatment of the deduction shall conform to the provisions of 26 USCS Section 179 in effect for that year. 4.  For the purposes of this subparagraph (ii), unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: a.  "Qualified improvement property" means and has the same definition as such term has in 26 USCS Section 168(e)(6) as it existed on January 1, 2021, and shall apply to property placed in service after December 31, 2022. b.  "Qualified property" means and has the same definition as such term has in 26 USCS Section 168(k) as it existed on January 1, 2021, and shall apply to property placed in service after December 31, 2022. c.  "Specified research or experimental expenditures" means and has the same definition as such term has in 26 USCS Section 174 as it existed on January 1, 2021. 5.  Nothing in this subparagraph (ii) shall be construed to nullify or otherwise alter the treatment of depreciation expenses for any tax year prior to 2023. 6.  The total of any method or combination of methods of depreciation used under this subparagraph (ii) cannot exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the subject property. (g)  Depletion. In the case of mines, oil and gas wells, other natural deposits and timber, a reasonable allowance for depletion and for depreciation of improvements, based upon cost, including cost of development, not otherwise deducted, or fair market value as of March 16, 1912, if acquired prior to that date, such allowance to be made upon regulations prescribed by the commissioner, with the approval of the Governor. (h)  Contributions or gifts.  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (p) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a) of this section for individuals, contributions or gifts made by corporations within the taxable year to corporations, organizations, associations or institutions, including Community Chest funds, foundations and trusts created solely and exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to children or animals, no part of the net earnings of which inure to the benefit of any private stockholder or individual.  This deduction shall be allowed in an amount not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the net income.  Such contributions or gifts shall be allowable as deductions only if verified under rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner, with the approval of the Governor.  Contributions made in any form other than cash shall be allowed as a deduction, subject to the limitations herein provided, in an amount equal to the actual market value of the contributions at the time the contribution is actually made and consummated. (i)  Reserve funds - insurance companies.  In the case of insurance companies the net additions required by law to be made within the taxable year to reserve funds when such reserve funds are maintained for the purpose of liquidating policies at maturity. (j)  Annuity income. The sums, other than dividends, paid within the taxpayer year on policy or annuity contracts when such income has been included in gross income. (k)  Contributions to employee pension plans.  Contributions made by an employer to a plan or a trust forming part of a pension plan, stock bonus plan, disability or death-benefit plan, or profit-sharing plan of such employer for the exclusive benefit of some or all of his, their, or its employees, or their beneficiaries, shall be deductible from his, their, or its income only to the extent that, and for the taxable year in which, the contribution is deductible for federal income tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and any other provisions of similar purport in the Internal Revenue Laws of the United States, and the rules, regulations, rulings and determinations promulgated thereunder, provided that: (i)  The plan or trust be irrevocable. (ii)  The plan or trust constitute a part of a pension plan, stock bonus plan, disability or death-benefit plan, or profit-sharing plan for the exclusive benefit of some or all of the employer's employees and/or officers, or their beneficiaries, for the purpose of distributing the corpus and income of the plan or trust to such employees and/or officers, or their beneficiaries. (iii)  No part of the corpus or income of the plan or trust can be used for purposes other than for the exclusive benefit of employees and/or officers, or their beneficiaries. Contributions to all plans or to all trusts of real or personal property (or real and personal property combined) or to insured plans created under a retirement plan for which provision has been made under the laws of the United States of America, making such contributions deductible from income for federal income tax purposes, shall be deductible only to the same extent under the Income Tax Laws of the State of Mississippi. (l)  Net operating loss carrybacks and carryovers.  A net operating loss for any taxable year ending after December 31, 1993, and taxable years thereafter, shall be a net operating loss carryback to each of the three (3) taxable years preceding the taxable year of the loss.  If the net operating loss for any taxable year is not exhausted by carrybacks to the three (3) taxable years preceding the taxable year of the loss, then there shall be a net operating loss carryover to each of the fifteen (15) taxable years following the taxable year of the loss beginning with any taxable year after December 31, 1991. For any taxable year ending after December 31, 1997, the period for net operating loss carrybacks and net operating loss carryovers shall be the same as those established by the Internal Revenue Code and the rules, regulations, rulings and determinations promulgated thereunder as in effect at the taxable year end or on December 31, 2000, whichever is earlier. A net operating loss for any taxable year ending after December 31, 2001, and taxable years thereafter, shall be a net operating loss carryback to each of the two (2) taxable years preceding the taxable year of the loss.  If the net operating loss for any taxable year is not exhausted by carrybacks to the two (2) taxable years preceding the taxable year of the loss, then there shall be a net operating loss carryover to each of the twenty (20) taxable years following the taxable year of the loss beginning with any taxable year after the taxable year of the loss. The term "net operating loss," for the purposes of this paragraph, shall be the excess of the deductions allowed over the gross income; provided, however, the following deductions shall not be allowed in computing same: (i)  No net operating loss deduction shall be allowed. (ii)  No personal exemption deduction shall be allowed. (iii)  Allowable deductions which are not attributable to taxpayer's trade or business shall be allowed only to the extent of the amount of gross income not derived from such trade or business. Any taxpayer entitled to a carryback period as provided by this paragraph may elect to relinquish the entire carryback period with respect to a net operating loss for any taxable year ending after December 31, 1991.  The election shall be made in the manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue and shall be made by the due date, including extensions of time, for filing the taxpayer's return for the taxable year of the net operating loss for which the election is to be in effect.  The election, once made for any taxable year, shall be irrevocable for that taxable year. (m)  Amortization of pollution or environmental control facilities.  Allowance of deduction. Every taxpayer, at his election, shall be entitled to a deduction for pollution or environmental control facilities to the same extent as that allowed under the Internal Revenue Code and the rules, regulations, rulings and determinations promulgated thereunder. (n)  Dividend distributions - real estate investment trusts.  "Real estate investment trust" (hereinafter referred to as REIT) shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 856 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.  A REIT is allowed a dividend distributed deduction if the dividend distributions meet the requirements of Section 857 or are otherwise deductible under Section 858 or 860, federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.  In addition: (i)  A dividend distributed deduction shall only be allowed for dividends paid by a publicly traded REIT.  A qualified REIT subsidiary shall be allowed a dividend distributed deduction if its owner is a publicly traded REIT. (ii)  Income generated from real estate contributed or sold to a REIT by a shareholder or related party shall not give rise to a dividend distributed deduction, unless the shareholder or related party would have received the dividend distributed deduction under this chapter. (iii)  A holding corporation receiving a dividend from a REIT shall not be allowed the deduction in Section 27-7-15(4)(t). (iv)  Any REIT not allowed the dividend distributed deduction in the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall not be allowed a dividend distributed deduction under this chapter. The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions in Section 269 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, so as to prevent the evasion or avoidance of state income tax. (o)  Contributions to college savings trust fund accounts.  Contributions or payments to a Mississippi Affordable College Savings Program account are deductible as provided under Section 37-155-113.  Payments made under a prepaid tuition contract entered into under the Mississippi Prepaid Affordable College Tuition Program are deductible as provided under Section 37-155-17. (p)  Contributions of human pharmaceutical products.  To the extent that a "major supplier" as defined in Section 27-13-13(2)(d) contributes human pharmaceutical products in excess of Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00) as determined under Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, the charitable contribution limitation associated with those donations shall follow the federal limitation but cannot result in the Mississippi net income being reduced below zero. (q)  Contributions to ABLE trust fund accounts.  Contributions or payments to a Mississippi Achieving a Better Life Experience (ABLE) Program account are deductible as provided under Section 43-28-13. (2)  Restrictions on the deductibility of certain intangible expenses and interest expenses with a related member. (a)  As used in this subsection (2): (i)  "Intangible expenses and costs" include: 1.  Expenses, losses and costs for, related to, or in connection directly or indirectly with the direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, ownership, sale, exchange or any other disposition of intangible property to the extent such amounts are allowed as deductions or costs in determining taxable income under this chapter; 2.  Expenses or losses related to or incurred in connection directly or indirectly with factoring transactions or discounting transactions; 3.  Royalty, patent, technical and copyright fees; 4.  Licensing fees; and 5.  Other similar expenses and costs. (ii)  "Intangible property" means patents, patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service marks, copyrights and similar types of intangible assets. (iii)  "Interest expenses and cost" means amounts directly or indirectly allowed as deductions for purposes of determining taxable income under this chapter to the extent such interest expenses and costs are directly or indirectly for, related to, or in connection with the direct or indirect acquisition, maintenance, management, ownership, sale, exchange or disposition of intangible property. (iv)  "Related member" means an entity or person that, with respect to the taxpayer during all or any portion of the taxable year, is a related entity, a component member as defined in the Internal Revenue Code, or is an entity or a person to or from whom there is attribution of stock ownership in accordance with Section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue Code. (v)  "Related entity" means: 1.  A stockholder who is an individual or a member of the stockholder's family, as defined in regulations prescribed by the commissioner, if the stockholder and the members of the stockholder's family own, directly, indirectly, beneficially or constructively, in the aggregate, at least fifty percent (50%) of the value of the taxpayer's outstanding stock; 2.  A stockholder, or a stockholder's partnership, limited liability company, estate, trust or corporation, if the stockholder and the stockholder's partnerships, limited liability companies, estates, trusts and corporations own, directly, indirectly, beneficially or constructively, in the aggregate, at least fifty percent (50%) of the value of the taxpayer's outstanding stock; 3.  A corporation, or a party related to the corporation in a manner that would require an attribution of stock from the corporation to the party or from the party to the corporation, if the taxpayer owns, directly, indirectly, beneficially or constructively, at least fifty percent (50%) of the value of the corporation's outstanding stock under regulation prescribed by the commissioner; 4.  Any entity or person which would be a related member under this section if the taxpayer were considered a corporation for purposes of this section. (b)  In computing net income, a taxpayer shall add back otherwise deductible interest expenses and costs and intangible expenses and costs directly or indirectly paid, accrued to or incurred, in connection directly or indirectly with one or more direct or indirect transactions with one or more related members. (c) The adjustments required by this subsection shall not apply to such portion of interest expenses and costs and intangible expenses and costs that the taxpayer can establish meets one (1) of the following: (i)  The related member directly or indirectly paid, accrued or incurred such portion to a person during the same income year who is not a related member; or (ii)  The transaction giving rise to the interest expenses and costs or intangible expenses and costs between the taxpayer and related member was done primarily for a valid business purpose other than the avoidance of taxes, and the related member is not primarily engaged in the acquisition, use, maintenance or management, ownership, sale, exchange or any other disposition of intangible property. (d)  Nothing in this subsection shall require a taxpayer to add to its net income more than once any amount of interest expenses and costs or intangible expenses and costs that the taxpayer pays, accrues or incurs to a related member. (e)  The commissioner may prescribe such regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this subsection, including, but not limited to, clarifying definitions of terms, rules of stock attribution, factoring and discount transactions. (3)  Individual nonbusiness deductions. (a)  The amount allowable for individual nonbusiness itemized deductions for federal income tax purposes where the individual is eligible to elect, for the taxable year, to itemize deductions on his federal return except the following: (i)  The deduction for state income taxes paid or other taxes allowed for federal purposes in lieu of state income taxes paid; (ii)  The deduction for gaming losses from gaming establishments; (iii)  The deduction for taxes collected by licensed gaming establishments pursuant to Section 27-7-901; (iv)  The deduction for taxes collected by gaming establishments pursuant to Section 27-7-903; and (v)  The deduction for medical expenses for the provision of gender transition procedures as defined in Section 41-141-3. (b)  In lieu of the individual nonbusiness itemized deductions authorized in paragraph (a), for all purposes other than ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred during the taxable year in carrying on any trade or business, an optional standard deduction of: (i)  Three Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($3,400.00) through calendar year 1997, Four Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($4,200.00) for the calendar year 1998 and Four Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($4,600.00) for each calendar year thereafter in the case of married individuals filing a joint or combined return; (ii)  One Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($1,700.00) through calendar year 1997, Two Thousand One Hundred Dollars ($2,100.00) for the calendar year 1998 and Two Thousand Three Hundred Dollars ($2,300.00) for each calendar year thereafter in the case of married individuals filing separate returns; (iii)  Three Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($3,400.00) in the case of a head of family; or (iv)  Two Thousand Three Hundred Dollars ($2,300.00) in the case of an individual who is not married. In the case of a husband and wife living together, having separate incomes, and filing combined returns, the standard deduction authorized may be divided in any manner they choose.  In the case of separate returns by a husband and wife, the standard deduction shall not be allowed to either if the taxable income of one of the spouses is determined without regard to the standard deduction. (c)  A nonresident individual shall be allowed the same individual nonbusiness deductions as are authorized for resident individuals in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection; however, the nonresident individual is entitled only to that proportion of the individual nonbusiness deductions as his net income from sources within the State of Mississippi bears to his total or entire net income from all sources. (4)  Nothing in this section shall permit the same item to be deducted more than once, either in fact or in effect. (5) Notwithstanding any other provision in Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, there shall be allowed an income tax deduction for otherwise deductible expenses if: (a)  The payment(s) for such deductible expenses are made with the grant or loan program of the Paycheck Protection Program as authorized under (i) the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act and the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021, (ii) the COVID-19 Economic Injury Disaster Loan Program, (iii) the 2020 COVID-19 Mississippi Business Assistance Act, (iv) the Rental Assistance Grant Program, (v) the Shuttered Venue Operators Grant Program and Restaurant Revitalization Fund authorized by the Economic Aid to Hard-Hit Small Businesses, Nonprofits, and Venues Act, and amended by the federal American Rescue Plan Act, and/or (vi) the Mississippi Agriculture Stabilization Act; and (b)  Such deductible expenses shall be allowed as deductions for federal income tax purposes. SECTION 6.  Section 27-7-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-7-15.  (1)  For the purposes of this article, except as otherwise provided, the term "gross income" means and includes the income of a taxpayer derived from salaries, wages, fees or compensation for service, of whatever kind and in whatever form paid, including income from governmental agencies and subdivisions thereof; or from professions, vocations, trades, businesses, commerce or sales, or renting or dealing in property, or reacquired property; also from annuities, interest, rents, dividends, securities, insurance premiums, reinsurance premiums, considerations for supplemental insurance contracts, or the transaction of any business carried on for gain or profit, or gains, or profits, and income derived from any source whatever and in whatever form paid.  The amount of all such items of income shall be included in the gross income for the taxable year in which received by the taxpayer.  The amount by which an eligible employee's salary is reduced pursuant to a salary reduction agreement authorized under Section 25-17-5 shall be excluded from the term "gross income" within the meaning of this article. (2)  In determining gross income for the purpose of this section, the following, under regulations prescribed by the commissioner, shall be applicable: (a)  Dealers in property.  Federal rules, regulations and revenue procedures shall be followed with respect to installment sales unless a transaction results in the shifting of income from inside the state to outside the state. (b)  Casual sales of property. (i)  Prior to January 1, 2001, federal rules, regulations and revenue procedures shall be followed with respect to installment sales except they shall be applied and administered as if H.R. 3594, the Installment Tax Correction Act of 2000 of the 106th Congress, had not been enacted.  This provision will generally affect taxpayers, reporting on the accrual method of accounting, entering into installment note agreements on or after December 17, 1999.  Any gain or profit resulting from the casual sale of property will be recognized in the year of sale. (ii)  From and after January 1, 2001, federal rules, regulations and revenue procedures shall be followed with respect to installment sales except as provided in this subparagraph (ii).  Gain or profit from the casual sale of property shall be recognized in the year of sale.  When a taxpayer recognizes gain on the casual sale of property in which the gain is deferred for federal income tax purposes, a taxpayer may elect to defer the payment of tax resulting from the gain as allowed and to the extent provided under regulations prescribed by the commissioner.  If the payment of the tax is made on a deferred basis, the tax shall be computed based on the applicable rate for the income reported in the year the payment is made.  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (b), deferring the payment of the tax shall not affect the liability for the tax.  If at any time the installment note is sold, contributed, transferred or disposed of in any manner and for any purpose by the original note holder, or the original note holder is merged, liquidated, dissolved or withdrawn from this state, then all deferred tax payments under this section shall immediately become due and payable. (iii)  If the selling price of the property is reduced by any alteration in the terms of an installment note, including default by the purchaser, the gain to be recognized is recomputed based on the adjusted selling price in the same manner as for federal income tax purposes.  The tax on this amount, less the previously paid tax on the recognized gain, is payable over the period of the remaining installments.  If the tax on the previously recognized gain has been paid in full to this state, the return on which the payment was made may be amended for this purpose only.  The statute of limitations in Section 27-7-49 shall not bar an amended return for this purpose. (c)  Reserves of insurance companies.  In the case of insurance companies, any amounts in excess of the legally required reserves shall be included as gross income. (d)  Affiliated companies or persons.  As regards sales, exchanges or payments for services from one to another of affiliated companies or persons or under other circumstances where the relation between the buyer and seller is such that gross proceeds from the sale or the value of the exchange or the payment for services are not indicative of the true value of the subject matter of the sale, exchange or payment for services, the commissioner shall prescribe uniform and equitable rules for determining the true value of the gross income, gross sales, exchanges or payment for services, or require consolidated returns of affiliates. (e)  Alimony and separate maintenance payments.  The federal rules, regulations and revenue procedures in determining the deductibility and taxability of alimony payments shall be followed in this state. (f)  Reimbursement for expenses of moving.  There shall be included in gross income (as compensation for services) any amount received or accrued, directly or indirectly, by an individual as a payment for or reimbursement of expenses of moving from one (1) residence to another residence which is attributable to employment or self-employment. (3)  In the case of taxpayers other than residents, gross income includes gross income from sources within this state. (4)  The words "gross income" do not include the following items of income which shall be exempt from taxation under this article: (a)  The proceeds of life insurance policies and contracts paid upon the death of the insured.  However, the income from the proceeds of such policies or contracts shall be included in the gross income. (b)  The amount received by the insured as a return of premium or premiums paid by him under life insurance policies, endowment, or annuity contracts, either during the term or at maturity or upon surrender of the contract. (c)  The value of property acquired by gift, bequest, devise or descent, but the income from such property shall be included in the gross income. (d)  Interest upon the obligations of the United States or its possessions, or securities issued under the provisions of the Federal Farm Loan Act of 1916, or bonds issued by the War Finance Corporation, or obligations of the State of Mississippi or political subdivisions thereof. (e)  The amounts received through accident or health insurance as compensation for personal injuries or sickness, plus the amount of any damages received for such injuries or such sickness or injuries, or through the War Risk Insurance Act, or any law for the benefit or relief of injured or disabled members of the military or naval forces of the United States. (f)  Income received by any religious denomination or by any institution or trust for moral or mental improvements, religious, Bible, tract, charitable, benevolent, fraternal, missionary, hospital, infirmary, educational, scientific, literary, library, patriotic, historical or cemetery purposes or for two (2) or more of such purposes, if such income be used exclusively for carrying out one or more of such purposes. (g)  Income received by a domestic corporation which is "taxable in another state" as this term is defined in this article, derived from business activity conducted outside this state.  Domestic corporations taxable both within and without the state shall determine Mississippi income on the same basis as provided for foreign corporations under the provisions of this article. (h)  In case of insurance companies, there shall be excluded from gross income such portion of actual premiums received from an individual policyholder as is paid back or credited to or treated as an abatement of premiums of such policyholder within the taxable year. (i)  Income from dividends that has already borne a tax as dividend income under the provisions of this article, when such dividends may be specifically identified in the possession of the recipient. (j)  Amounts paid by the United States to a person as added compensation for hazardous duty pay as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States in a combat zone designated by Executive Order of the President of the United States. (k)  Amounts received as retirement allowances, pensions, annuities or optional retirement allowances paid under the federal Social Security Act, the Railroad Retirement Act, the Federal Civil Service Retirement Act, or any other retirement system of the United States government, retirement allowances paid under the Mississippi Public Employees' Retirement System, Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System or any other retirement system of the State of Mississippi or any political subdivision thereof.  The exemption allowed under this paragraph (k) shall be available to the spouse or other beneficiary at the death of the primary retiree. (l)  Amounts received as retirement allowances, pensions, annuities or optional retirement allowances paid by any public or governmental retirement system not designated in paragraph (k) or any private retirement system or plan of which the recipient was a member at any time during the period of his employment.  Amounts received as a distribution under a Roth Individual Retirement Account shall be treated in the same manner as provided under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.  The exemption allowed under this paragraph (l) shall be available to the spouse or other beneficiary at the death of the primary retiree. (m)  National Guard or Reserve Forces of the United States compensation not to exceed the aggregate sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for any taxable year through the 2005 taxable year, and not to exceed the aggregate sum of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) for any taxable year thereafter. (n)  Compensation received for active service as a member below the grade of commissioned officer and so much of the compensation as does not exceed the maximum enlisted amount received for active service as a commissioned officer in the Armed Forces of the United States for any month during any part of which such members of the Armed Forces (i) served in a combat zone as designated by Executive Order of the President of the United States or a qualified hazardous duty area as defined by federal law, or both; or (ii) was hospitalized as a result of wounds, disease or injury incurred while serving in such combat zone.  For the purposes of this paragraph (n), the term "maximum enlisted amount" means and has the same definition as that term has in 26 USCS 112. (o)  The proceeds received from federal and state forestry incentive programs. (p)  The amount representing the difference between the increase of gross income derived from sales for export outside the United States as compared to the preceding tax year wherein gross income from export sales was highest, and the net increase in expenses attributable to such increased exports.  In the absence of direct accounting, the ratio of net profits to total sales may be applied to the increase in export sales.  This paragraph (p) shall only apply to businesses located in this state engaging in the international export of Mississippi goods and services.  Such goods or services shall have at least fifty percent (50%) of value added at a location in Mississippi. (q)  Amounts paid by the federal government for the construction of soil conservation systems as required by a conservation plan adopted pursuant to 16 USCS 3801 et seq. (r)  The amount deposited in a medical savings account, and any interest accrued thereon, that is a part of a medical savings account program as specified in the Medical Savings Account Act under Sections 71-9-1 through 71-9-9; provided, however, that any amount withdrawn from such account for purposes other than paying eligible medical expense or to procure health coverage shall be included in gross income. (s)  Amounts paid by the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission from the Mississippi Soil and Water Cost-Share Program for the installation of water quality best management practices. (t)  Dividends received by a holding corporation, as defined in Section 27-13-1, from a subsidiary corporation, as defined in Section 27-13-1. (u)  Interest, dividends, gains or income of any kind on any account in the Mississippi Affordable College Savings Trust Fund, as established in Sections 37-155-101 through 37-155-125, to the extent that such amounts remain on deposit in the MACS Trust Fund or are withdrawn pursuant to a qualified withdrawal, as defined in Section 37-155-105. (v)  Interest, dividends or gains accruing on the payments made pursuant to a prepaid tuition contract, as provided for in Section 37-155-17. (w)  Income resulting from transactions with a related member where the related member subject to tax under this chapter was required to, and did in fact, add back the expense of such transactions as required by Section 27-7-17(2).  Under no circumstances may the exclusion from income exceed the deduction add-back of the related member, nor shall the exclusion apply to any income otherwise excluded under this chapter. (x)  Amounts that are subject to the tax levied pursuant to Section 27-7-901, and are paid to patrons by gaming establishments licensed under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act. (y)  Amounts that are subject to the tax levied pursuant to Section 27-7-903, and are paid to patrons by gaming establishments not licensed under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act. (z)  Interest, dividends, gains or income of any kind on any account in a qualified tuition program and amounts received as distributions under a qualified tuition program shall be treated in the same manner as provided under the United States Internal Revenue Code, as amended.  For the purposes of this paragraph (z), the term "qualified tuition program" means and has the same definition as that term has in 26 USCS 529. (aa)  The amount deposited in a health savings account, and any interest accrued thereon, that is a part of a health savings account program as specified in the Health Savings Accounts Act created in Sections 83-62-1 through 83-62-9; however, any amount withdrawn from such account for purposes other than paying qualified medical expenses or to procure health coverage shall be included in gross income, except as otherwise provided by Sections 83-62-7 and 83-62-9. (bb)  Amounts received as qualified disaster relief payments shall be treated in the same manner as provided under the United States Internal Revenue Code, as amended. (cc)  Amounts received as a "qualified Hurricane Katrina distribution" as defined in the United States Internal Revenue Code, as amended. (dd)  Amounts received by an individual which may be excluded from income as foreign earned income for federal income tax purposes. (ee)  Amounts received by a qualified individual, directly or indirectly, from an employer or nonprofit housing organization that are qualified housing expenses associated with an employer-assisted housing program.  For purposes of this paragraph (ee): (i)  "Qualified individual" means any individual whose household income does not exceed one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the area median gross income (as defined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development), adjusted for household size, for the area in which the housing is located. (ii)  "Nonprofit housing organization" means an organization that is organized as a not-for-profit organization under the laws of this state or another state and has as one of its purposes: 1. Homeownership education or counseling; 2.  The development of affordable housing; or 3.  The development or administration of employer-assisted housing programs. (iii)  "Employer-assisted housing program" means a separate written plan of any employer (including, without limitation, tax-exempt organizations and public employers) for the exclusive benefit of the employer's employees to pay qualified housing expenses to assist the employer's employees in securing affordable housing. (iv)  "Qualified housing expenses" means: 1.  With respect to rental assistance, an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) paid for the purpose of assisting employees with security deposits and rental subsidies; and 2.  With respect to homeownership assistance, an amount not to exceed the lesser of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or six percent (6%) of the purchase price of the employee's principal residence that is paid for the purpose of assisting employees with down payments, payment of closing costs, reduced interest mortgages, mortgage guarantee programs, mortgage forgiveness programs, equity contribution programs, or contributions to homebuyer education and/or homeownership counseling of eligible employees. (ff)  For the 2010 taxable year and any taxable year thereafter, amounts converted in accordance with the United States Internal Revenue Code, as amended, from a traditional Individual Retirement Account to a Roth Individual Retirement Account.  The exemption allowed under this paragraph (ff) shall be available to the spouse or other beneficiary at the death of the primary retiree. (gg)  Amounts received for the performance of disaster or emergency-related work as defined in Section 27-113-5. (hh)  The amount deposited in a catastrophe savings account established under Sections 27-7-1001 through 27-7-1007, interest income earned on the catastrophe savings account, and distributions from the catastrophe savings account; however, any amount withdrawn from a catastrophe savings account for purposes other than paying qualified catastrophe expenses shall be included in gross income, except as otherwise provided by Sections 27-7-1001 through 27-7-1007. (ii)  Interest, dividends, gains or income of any kind on any account in the Mississippi Achieving a Better Life Experience (ABLE) Trust Fund, as established in Chapter 28, Title 43, to the extent that such amounts remain on deposit in the ABLE Trust Fund or are withdrawn pursuant to a qualified withdrawal, as defined in Section 43-28-11. (jj) Subject to the limitations provided under Section 27-7-1103, amounts deposited into a first-time homebuyer savings account and any interest or other income earned attributable to an account and monies or funds withdrawn or distributed from an account for the payment of eligible costs by or on behalf of a qualified beneficiary; however, any monies or funds withdrawn or distributed from a first-time homebuyer savings account for any purpose other than the payment of eligible costs by or on behalf of a qualified beneficiary shall be included in gross income.  For the purpose of this paragraph (jj), the terms "first-time homebuyer savings account," "eligible costs" and "qualified beneficiary" mean and have the same definitions as such terms have in Section 27-7-1101. (kk)  Amounts paid by an agricultural disaster program as compensation to an agricultural producer, cattle farmer or cattle rancher who has suffered a loss as the result of a disaster or emergency, including, but not limited to, the following United States Department of Agriculture programs: (i)  Livestock Forage Disaster Program; (ii)  Livestock Indemnity Program; (iii)  Emergency Assistance for Livestock, Honey Bees and Farm-raised Fish Program; (iv)  Emergency Conservation Program; (v)  Noninsured Crop Disaster Assistance Program; (vi)  Pasture, Rangeland, Forage Pilot Insurance Program; (vii)  Annual Forage Pilot Program; (viii)  Livestock Risk Protection Insurance Program; and (ix)  Livestock Gross Margin Insurance Plan. (ll)  Amounts received as advances and/or grants under the federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act, the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021 and the American Rescue Plan Act. (mm)  Any and all cancelled indebtedness provided for under the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act and the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021. (nn)  Amounts received as payments under Section 27-3-85. (oo)  Amounts received as grants under the 2020 COVID-19 Mississippi Business Assistance Act. (pp)  Amounts received as grants under Section 57-1-521. ( * * *rrqq)  Amounts received as grants under the Shuttered Venue Operators Grant Program and Restaurant Revitalization Fund authorized by the Economic Aid to Hard-Hit Small Businesses, Nonprofits, and Venues Act, and amended by the American Rescue Plan Act. ( * * *ssrr)  Amounts received as grants under the Mississippi Agriculture Stabilization Act. (ss)  Amounts received as contributions to an independent contractor's portable benefit account from a hiring party, as authorized under Sections 1 through 4 of this act. (5)  Prisoners of war, missing in action-taxable status. (a)  Members of the Armed Forces.  Gross income does not include compensation received for active service as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States for any month during any part of which such member is in a missing status, as defined in paragraph (d) of this subsection, during the Vietnam Conflict as a result of such conflict. (b)  Civilian employees.  Gross income does not include compensation received for active service as an employee for any month during any part of which such employee is in a missing status during the Vietnam Conflict as a result of such conflict. (c)  Period of conflict.  For the purpose of this subsection, the Vietnam Conflict began February 28, 1961, and ends on the date designated by the President by Executive Order as the date of the termination of combatant activities in Vietnam.  For the purpose of this subsection, an individual is in a missing status as a result of the Vietnam Conflict if immediately before such status began he was performing service in Vietnam or was performing service in Southeast Asia in direct support of military operations in Vietnam.  "Southeast Asia," as used in this paragraph, is defined to include Cambodia, Laos, Thailand and waters adjacent thereto. (d)  "Missing status" means the status of an employee or member of the Armed Forces who is in active service and is officially carried or determined to be absent in a status of (i) missing; (ii) missing in action; (iii) interned in a foreign country; (iv) captured, beleaguered or besieged by a hostile force; or (v) detained in a foreign country against his will; but does not include the status of an employee or member of the Armed Forces for a period during which he is officially determined to be absent from his post of duty without authority. (e)  "Active service" means active federal service by an employee or member of the Armed Forces of the United States in an active duty status. (f)  "Employee" means one who is a citizen or national of the United States or an alien admitted to the United States for permanent residence and is a resident of the State of Mississippi and is employed in or under a federal executive agency or department of the Armed Forces. (g)  "Compensation" means (i) basic pay; (ii) special pay; (iii) incentive pay; (iv) basic allowance for quarters; (v) basic allowance for subsistence; and (vi) station per diem allowances for not more than ninety (90) days. (h)  If refund or credit of any overpayment of tax for any taxable year resulting from the application of this subsection (5) is prevented by the operation of any law or rule of law, such refund or credit of such overpayment of tax may, nevertheless, be made or allowed if claim therefor is filed with the Department of Revenue within three (3) years after the date of the enactment of this subsection. (i)  The provisions of this subsection shall be effective for taxable years ending on or after February 28, 1961. (6)  A shareholder of an S corporation, as defined in Section 27-8-3(1)(g), shall take into account the income, loss, deduction or credit of the S corporation only to the extent provided in Section 27-8-7(2). SECTION 7.  Sections 1 through 4 of this act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.  Sections 5 and 6 of this act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027.